Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 2
SAFETY GLAZING MATERIALS

9-2-101 to 9-2-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article repealed, p. 502, § 125, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 2 of chapter 80, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1986, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.